Idaho, session 2025, H0038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 41-4303, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-4303. COVERAGE AND LIMITATIONS. (1) This chapter shall provide
coverage for the policies and contracts specified in subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) To persons, except for nonresident certificate holders under group
policies or contracts who, regardless of where they reside, are the ben-
eficiaries, assignees or payees of the persons covered under paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(b) To persons who are owners of or certificate holders under the poli-
cies or contracts, other than structured settlement annuities, and in
each case who:
(i) Are residents; or
(ii) Are not residents, but only under all of the following condi-
tions:
1. The insurer that issued the policies or contracts is
domiciled in this state;
2. The states in which the persons reside have associations
similar to the association created by this chapter; and
3. The persons are not eligible for coverage by an asso-
ciation in any other state due to the fact that the insurer
was not licensed in the state at the time specified in the
state's guaranty association law.
(c) For structured settlement annuities specified in subsection (2) of
this section, paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not ap-
ply, and this chapter shall, except as provided in paragraphs (d) and
(e) of this subsection, provide coverage to a person who is a payee under
a structured settlement annuity, or beneficiary of a payee if the payee
is deceased, if the payee:
(i) Is a resident, regardless of where the contract owner re-
sides; or
(ii) Is not a resident, but only under both of the following condi-
tions:


1.(A) The contract owner of the structured settlement
annuity is a resident; or
(B) The contract owner of the structured settlement
annuity is not a resident; but the insurer that issued
the structured settlement annuity is domiciled in this
state; and the state in which the contract owner re-
sides has an association similar to the association
created in this chapter; and
2. Neither the payee or beneficiary nor the contract owner
is eligible for coverage by the association of the state in
which the payee or contract owner resides.
(d) The provisions of this chapter shall not provide coverage to a:
(i) A person who is a payee or beneficiary of a contract owner res-
ident of this state, if the payee or beneficiary is afforded any
coverage by the association of another state.; or
(ii) A person who acquires rights to receive payments through
a structured settlement factoring transaction as defined in 26
U.S.C. 5891(c)(3)(A), regardless of whether the transaction oc-
curred before or after such section became effective.
(e) This chapter is intended to provide coverage to a person who is a
resident of this state and, in special circumstances, to a nonresident.
In order to avoid duplicate coverage, if a person who would otherwise
receive coverage under this chapter is provided coverage under the laws
of any other state, the person shall not be provided coverage under this
chapter. In determining the application of the provisions of this para-
graph in situations where a person could be covered by the association
of more than one (1) state, whether as an owner, payee, beneficiary or
assignee, the provisions of this chapter shall be construed in conjunc-
tion with other state laws to result in coverage by only one (1) associa-
tion.
(2)(a) The provisions of this chapter shall provide coverage to
the persons specified in subsection (1) of this section for direct,
non-group life, health or annuity policies or contracts and for cer-
tificates under direct group policies and contracts and for supple-
mental contracts to any of these, except as limited by this chapter.
Annuity contracts and certificates under group annuity contracts in-
clude allocated funding agreements, structured settlement annuities
and any immediate or deferred annuity contracts.
(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not provide coverage for:
(i) A portion of a policy or contract not guaranteed by the in-
surer, or under which the risk is borne by the policy or contract
owner;
(ii) A policy or contract of reinsurance, unless assumption cer-
tificates have been issued pursuant to the reinsurance policy or
contract;
(iii) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the rate
of interest on which it is based, or the interest rate, crediting
rate or similar factor determined by use of an index or other ex-
ternal reference stated in the policy or contract employed in cal-
culating returns or changes in value:


1. Averaged over the period of four (4) years prior to the
date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or in-
solvent insurer under this chapter, whichever is earlier,
exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting two
(2) percentage points from Moody's corporate bond yield av-
erage averaged for that same four (4) year period or for such
lesser period if the policy or contract was issued less than
four (4) years before the member insurer becomes an impaired
or insolvent insurer under the provisions of this chapter,
whichever is earlier; and
2. On and after the date on which the member insurer be-
comes an impaired or insolvent insurer under the provisions
of this chapter, whichever is earlier, exceeds the rate of
interest determined by subtracting three (3) percentage
points from Moody's corporate bond yield average as most re-
cently available;
(iv) A portion of a policy or contract issued to a plan or pro-
gram of an employer, association or other person to provide life,
health or annuity benefits to its employees, members or others, to
the extent that the plan or program is self-funded or uninsured in-
cluding, but not limited to, benefits payable by an employer, as-
sociation or other person under:
1. A multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in
section 3(40) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, 29 U.S.C. section 1002(40);
2. A minimum premium group insurance plan;
3. A stop-loss group insurance plan; or
4. An administrative services only contract;
(v) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that it pro-
vides for:
1. Dividends or experience rating credits;
2. Voting rights; or
3. Payment of any fees or allowances to any person, includ-
ing the policy or contract owner, in connection with the ser-
vice to or administration of the policy or contract;
(vi) A policy or contract issued in this state by a member insurer
at a time when it was not licensed or did not have a certificate of
authority to issue the policy or contract in this state;
(vii) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the as-
sessments required in section 41-4309, Idaho Code, with respect to
the policy or contract are preempted by federal or state law;
(viii) An obligation that does not arise under the express written
terms of the policy or contract issued by the insurer to the con-
tract owner or policy owner, including without limitation:
1. Claims based on marketing materials;
2. Claims based on side letters, riders or other documents
that were issued by the insurer without meeting applicable
policy form filing or approval requirements;
3. Misrepresentations of or regarding policy benefits;
4. Extra-contractual claims; or


5. A claim for penalties or consequential or incidental dam-
ages;
(ix) A contractual agreement that establishes the member in-
surer's obligations to provide a book value accounting guaranty
for defined contribution benefit plan participants by reference
to a portfolio of assets that is owned by the benefit plan or its
trustee, which in each case is not an affiliate of the member in-
surer;
(x) An unallocated annuity contract;
(xi) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent it provides
for interest or other changes in value to be determined by the use
of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or
contract, but which have not been credited to the policy or con-
tract, or as to which the policy or contract owner's rights are
subject to forfeiture, as of the date the member insurer becomes an
impaired or insolvent insurer under the provisions of this chap-
ter, whichever is earlier. If a policy's or contract's interest or
changes in value are credited less frequently than annually, then
for purposes of determining the values that have been credited and
are not subject to forfeiture under this subparagraph, the inter-
est or change in value determined by using the procedures defined
in the policy or contract will be credited as if the contractual
date of crediting interest or changing values was the date of im-
pairment or insolvency, whichever is earlier, and will not be sub-
ject to forfeiture; and
(xii) A policy or contract providing any hospital, medical, pre-
scription drug or other health care benefits pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
part C or 42 U.S.C. part D, commonly known as medicare parts C and
D, or any regulations issued pursuant thereto.; and
(xiii) Structured settlement annuity benefits to which a payee or
beneficiary has transferred his rights in a structured settlement
factoring transaction as defined in 26 U.S.C. 5891(c)(3)(A), re-
gardless of whether the transaction occurred before or after such
section became effective.
(c) The exclusion for coverage described in paragraph (b)(iii) of this
subsection shall not apply to any portion of a policy or contract, in-
cluding a rider, that provides long-term care or any other health insur-
ance benefits.
(3) The benefits that the association may become obligated to cover
shall in no event exceed the lesser of:
(a) The contractual obligations for which the insurer is liable or
would have been liable if it were not an impaired or insolvent insurer;
or
(b) Subject to the aggregate per life limitation in paragraph (c) of
this subsection with respect to one (1) policy or contract:
(i) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in life insurance
death benefits, but not more than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values
for life insurance;


(ii) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in health insur-
ance claims or benefit payments or one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) in net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values
for health benefits, except for major medical insurance as defined
in section 41-4305, Idaho Code, and as provided for in subpara-
graph (iii) of this paragraph;
(iii) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for major medical
insurance as defined in section 41-4305, Idaho Code;
(iv) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in the present
value of annuity benefits, including net cash surrender and net
cash withdrawal values;
(v) With respect to each payee of a structured settlement annu-
ity, or beneficiary or beneficiaries of the payee if deceased, two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in present value annu-
ity benefits, in the aggregate, including net cash surrender and
net cash withdrawal values;
(c) However, in no event shall the association be obligated to cover
more than:
(i) An aggregate of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in
benefits with respect to any one (1) life under paragraph (b) of
this subsection, except with respect to benefits for major medical
insurance as provided in paragraph (b)(iii) of this subsection,
in which case the aggregate liability of the association shall not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) with respect to
any one (1) life; or
(ii) With respect to one (1) owner of multiple non-group poli-
cies of life insurance, whether the policy owner is an individual,
firm, corporation or other person, and whether the persons insured
are officers, managers, employees or other persons, more than five
million dollars ($5,000,000) in benefits, regardless of the num-
ber of policies and contracts held by the owner; or
(d) The limitations set forth in this subsection are limitations on
the benefits for which the association is obligated before taking into
account either its subrogation and assignment rights or the extent to
which those benefits could be provided out of the assets of the impaired
or insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies. The costs of the
association's obligations under the provisions of this chapter may be
met by the use of assets attributable to covered policies or reimbursed
to the association pursuant to its subrogation and assignment rights.
(e) For purposes of this act, benefits provided by a long-term care
rider to a life insurance policy or annuity contract shall be considered
the same type of benefits as the base life insurance policy or annuity
contract to which it relates.
(4) In performing its obligations to provide coverage under section
41-4308, Idaho Code, the association shall not be required to guarantee, as-
sume, reinsure or perform, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, reinsured or
performed, the contractual obligations of the insolvent or impaired insurer
under a covered policy or contract that do not materially affect the economic
values or economic benefits of the covered policy or contract.


SECTION 2. That Section 41-4305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-4305. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Account" means any of the three (3) accounts maintained pursuant
to section 41-4306, Idaho Code.
(2) "Association" means the Idaho life and health insurance guaranty
association.
(3) "Authorized assessment" or "authorized," when used in the context
of assessments, means a resolution by the board of directors has been passed
whereby an assessment will be called immediately or in the future from member
insurers for a specified amount. An assessment is authorized when the reso-
lution is passed.
(4) "Benefit plan" means a specific employee, union or association of
natural persons benefit plan.
(5) "Called assessment" or "called," when used in the context of as-
sessments, means that a notice has been issued by the association to mem-
ber insurers requiring that an authorized assessment be paid within the time
frame set forth within the notice. An authorized assessment becomes a called
assessment when notice is mailed by the association to member insurers.
(6) "Contractual obligation" means an obligation under a policy or con-
tract or certificate under a group policy or contract, or portion thereof for
which coverage is provided under section 41-4303, Idaho Code.
(7) "Covered policy" means a policy or contract or portion of a pol-
icy or contract for which coverage is provided under section 41-4303, Idaho
Code.
(8) "Director" means the director of the Idaho department of insurance.
(9) "Extra-contractual claims" shall include, for example, claims re-
lating to bad faith in the payment of claims, punitive or exemplary damages
or attorney's fees and costs.
(10) "Impaired insurer" means a member insurer:
(a) Deemed by the director after the effective date of this chapter to
be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations and not an
insolvent insurer; or
(b) Which, after the effective date of this chapter, is not an insolvent
insurer and is placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation
by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(11) "Insolvent insurer" means a member insurer which, after the effec-
tive date of this chapter, is placed under an order of liquidation by a court
of competent jurisdiction with a finding of insolvency.
(12)(a) "Major medical insurance" means, solely for purposes of this
chapter, health insurance policies, contracts or certificates that are
issued to provide hospital and medical-surgical coverage.
(b) "Major medical insurance" shall not include insurance policies,
contracts or certificates:
(i) Issued by an insurer providing only accident-only, credit,
dental, vision, long-term care or disability income insurance or
specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity insurance; or


(ii) For medicare supplement insurance or for coverage supplemen-
tal to the coverage provided under the civilian health and medical
program of the uniformed services (CHAMPUS).
(13)(a) "Member insurer" means an insurer licensed or that holds a
certificate of authority to transact in this state any kind of insur-
ance for which coverage is provided under section 41-4303, Idaho Code,
and includes an insurer whose license or certificate of authority in
this state may have been suspended, revoked, not renewed or voluntarily
withdrawn.
(b) "Member insurer" does not include:
(i) A hospital or medical service corporation or organization,
whether profit or nonprofit;
(ii) A fraternal benefit society;
(iii) A mandatory state pooling plan;
(iv) A mutual assessment company or other person that operates on
an assessment basis;
(v) An insurance exchange;
(vi) An organization that issues charitable gift annuities under
section 41-120, Idaho Code;
(vii) A mutual benefit association;
(viii) A reciprocal insurer;
(ix) A limited managed care plan; or
(x) A self-funded health care plan; or.
(xi) A consumer operated and oriented plan established under sec-
tion 1322 of the patient protection and affordable care act, P.L.
111-148.
(14) "Moody's corporate bond yield average" means the monthly average
corporates as published by Moody's investors service, inc., or any successor
thereto.
(15) "Owner," "policy owner" or "contract owner" means the person who is
identified as the legal owner under the terms of the policy or contract or
who is otherwise vested with legal title to the policy or contract through
a valid assignment completed in accordance with the terms of the policy or
contract and properly recorded as the owner on the books of the insurer. The
terms owner, contract owner and policy owner do not include persons with a
mere beneficial interest in a policy or contract.
(16) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability com-
pany, partnership, association, governmental body or entity or voluntary
organization.
(17)(a) "Premiums" means amounts or considerations, by whatever name
called, received on covered policies or contracts less returned pre-
miums, considerations and deposits and less dividends and experience
credits.
(b) "Premiums" does not include amounts or considerations received for
policies or contracts or for the portions of policies or contracts for
which coverage is not provided under section 41-4303(2), Idaho Code,
except that assessable premium shall not be reduced on account of sec-
tion 41-4303(2)(b)(iii), Idaho Code, relating to interest limitations
and section 41-4303(3)(b), (c) and (d), Idaho Code, relating to limi-


tations with respect to one (1) individual, one (1) participant and one
(1) contract owner. "Premiums" shall not include:
(i) Premiums on an unallocated annuity contract; or
(ii) With respect to multiple non-group policies of life insur-
ance owned by one (1) owner, whether the policy owner is an indi-
vidual, firm, corporation or other person, and whether the persons
insured are officers, managers, employees or other persons, pre-
miums in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) with respect
to these policies or contracts, regardless of the number of poli-
cies or contracts held by the owner.
(18)(a) "Principal place of business" of a plan sponsor or a person
other than a natural person means the single state in which the natural
persons who establish policy for the direction, control and coordina-
tion of the operations of the entity as a whole primarily exercise that
function, determined by the association in its reasonable judgment by
considering the following factors:
(i) The state in which the primary executive and administrative
headquarters of the entity is located;
(ii) The state in which the principal office of the chief execu-
tive officer of the entity is located;
(iii) The state in which the board of directors, or similar govern-
ing person or persons, of the entity conducts the majority of its
meetings;
(iv) The state in which the executive or management committee of
the board of directors, or similar governing person or persons, of
the entity conducts the majority of its meetings;
(v) The state from which the management of the overall operations
of the entity is directed; and
(vi) In the case of a benefit plan sponsored by affiliated compa-
nies comprising a consolidated corporation, the state in which the
holding company or controlling affiliate has its principal place
of business as determined using the factors contained in subpara-
graphs (i) through (v) of this paragraph.
However, in the case of a plan sponsor, if more than fifty percent (50%)
of the participants in the benefit plan are employed in a single state,
that state shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of the
plan sponsor.
(b) "Principal place of business" of a plan sponsor of a benefit plan
shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of the associa-
tion, committee, joint board of trustees or other similar group of rep-
resentatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan
that, in lieu of a specific or clear designation of a principal place
of business, shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of
the employer or employee organization that has the largest investment
in the benefit plan in question.
(19) "Receivership court" means the court in the insolvent or impaired
insurer's state having jurisdiction over the conservation, rehabilitation
or liquidation of the insurer.
(20) "Resident" means a person to whom a contractual obligation is owed
and who resides in this state on the date of entry of a court order that de-


termines a member insurer to be an impaired insurer or a court order that
determines a member insurer to be an insolvent insurer. A person may be a
resident of only one (1) state, which in the case of a person other than a
natural person shall be its principal place of business. Citizens of the
United States that are either (a) residents of foreign countries, or (b) res-
idents of United States possessions, territories or protectorates that do
not have an association similar to the association created in this chapter,
shall be deemed residents of the state of domicile of the insurer that issued
the policies or contracts.
(21) "State" means a state or a commonwealth of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and a United States possession, territory
or protectorate.
(22) "Structured settlement annuity" means an annuity purchased in or-
der to fund periodic payments for a plaintiff or other claimant in payment
for or with respect to personal injury suffered by the plaintiff or other
claimant.
(23) "Supplemental contract" means a written agreement entered into for
the distribution of proceeds under a life, health or annuity policy or con-
tract.
(24) "Unallocated annuity contract" means an annuity contract or group
annuity certificate which is not issued to and owned by an individual, except
to the extent of any annuity benefits guaranteed to an individual by an in-
surer under the contract or certificate.
SECTION 3. That Section 41-4309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-4309. ASSESSMENTS. (1) For the purpose of providing the funds nec-
essary to carry out the powers and duties of the association, the board of
directors shall assess the member insurers, separately for each account, at
such time and for such amounts as the board of directors finds necessary. As-
sessments shall be due not less than thirty (30) days after prior written no-
tice to the member insurers and shall accrue interest at eight percent (8%)
per annum on and after the due date.
(2) There shall be two (2) classes of assessments:
(a) Class A assessments shall be authorized and called for the purpose
of meeting administrative and other expenses. Class A assessments may
be authorized and called whether or not related to a particular impaired
or insolvent insurer.
(b) Class B assessments shall be authorized and called to the extent
necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the association under
section 41-4308, Idaho Code, with regard to an impaired or an insolvent
insurer.
(3)(a) The amount of a class A assessment shall be determined by at the
discretion of the board of directors and may be authorized and called on
a pro rata or non-pro rata basis. If pro rata, the board of directors may
provide that it be credited against future class B assessments. The to-
tal of all non-pro rata assessments shall not exceed three hundred dol-
lars ($300) per member insurer in any one (1) calendar year.
(b) The amount of a class B assessment, except for assessments related
to long-term care insurance, shall be allocated for assessment purposes


among the accounts pursuant to an allocation formula, which may be based
on the premiums or reserves of the impaired or insolvent insurer or any
other standard deemed by the board of directors in its sole discretion
as being fair and reasonable under the circumstances.
(c) The amount of a class B assessment for long-term care insurance
shall be allocated according to a methodology selected by the associa-
tion and approved by the director, which methodology shall provide for
fifty percent (50%) of the assessment to be allocated to health member
insurers and fifty percent (50%) to be allocated to life and annuity
member insurers.
(d) Class B assessments against member insurers for each account shall
be in the proportion that the premiums received on business in this
state by each assessed member insurer on policies covered by each ac-
count for the calendar year preceding the assessments bears to such
premiums received on business in this state for the calendar year pre-
ceding the assessment by all assessed member insurers.
(e) Assessments for funds to meet the requirements of the association
with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer shall not be authorized
or called until necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter.
Classification of assessments under this subsection and subsection (2)
of this section and computation of assessments under this subsection
shall be made with a reasonable degree of accuracy, recognizing that
exact determinations may not always be possible. The association shall
notify each member insurer of its anticipated pro rata share of an au-
thorized assessment not yet called within one hundred eighty (180) days
after the assessment is authorized.
(4) The association may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assess-
ment of a member insurer if, in the opinion of the board of directors, payment
of the assessment would endanger the ability of the member insurer to ful-
fill its contractual obligations. In the event an assessment against a mem-
ber insurer is abated, or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which
the assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other mem-
ber insurers in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth
in this section. Once the conditions that caused a deferral have been re-
moved or rectified, the member insurer shall pay all assessments that were
deferred pursuant to a repayment plan approved by the association.
(5)(a) The total of all class B assessments authorized by the associa-
tion with respect to a member insurer for each account shall not in one
(1) calendar year exceed two percent (2%) of such insurer's premiums re-
ceived in this state during the calendar year preceding the assessment
on the policies covered by the account. If the maximum assessment, to-
gether with the other assets of the association in an account, does not
provide in any one (1) year in an account an amount sufficient to carry
out the responsibilities of the association, the necessary additional
funds shall be assessed as soon thereafter as permitted by this chapter.
(b) The board of directors may provide in the plan of operation a method
of allocating funds among claims, whether relating to one (1) or more
impaired or insolvent insurers, when the maximum assessment will be in-
sufficient to cover anticipated claims.


(6) The board of directors may, by an equitable method as established in
the plan of operation, refund to member insurers, in proportion to the con-
tribution of each insurer to that account, the amount by which the assets of
the account exceed the amount the board of directors finds is necessary to
carry out during the coming year the obligations of the association with re-
gard to that account, including assets accruing from assignment, subroga-
tion, net realized gains and income from investments.
A reasonable amount, as determined by the board of directors in its dis-
cretion, may be retained by the association in any account to provide funds
for the continuing and future expenses of the association and for future loss
claims.
(7) It shall be proper for any member insurer, in determining its pre-
mium rates and policy owner dividends as to any kind of insurance within the
scope of this chapter, to consider the amount reasonably necessary to meet
its assessment obligations under this chapter.
(8) The association shall issue to each insurer paying an assessment
under this chapter, other than a class A assessment, a certificate of contri-
bution in a form prescribed by the director for the amount of the assessment
so paid. All outstanding certificates shall be of equal dignity and prior-
ity without reference to amounts or dates of issue. A certificate of contri-
bution may be shown by the insurer in its financial statement as an asset in
such form and for such amount, if any, and period of time as the director may
approve.
(9)(a) A member insurer that wishes to protest all or part of an assess-
ment shall pay when due the full amount of the assessment as set forth in
the notice provided by the association. The payment shall be available
to meet association obligations during the pendency of the protest or
any subsequent appeal. Payment shall be accompanied by a statement in
writing that the payment is made under protest and setting forth a brief
statement of the grounds for the protest.
(b) Within sixty (60) days following the payment of an assessment under
protest by a member insurer, the association shall notify the member in-
surer in writing of its determination with respect to the protest unless
the association notifies the member insurer that additional time is re-
quired to resolve the issues raised by the protest.
(c) Within thirty (30) days after a final decision has been made, the
association shall notify the protesting member insurer in writing of
that final decision. Within sixty (60) days of receipt of notice of the
final decision, the protesting member insurer may appeal that final
action to the director.
(d) In the alternative to rendering a final decision with respect to a
protest based on a question regarding the assessment base, the associ-
ation may refer protests to the director for a final decision, with or
without a recommendation from the association.
(e) If the protest or appeal on the assessment is upheld, the amount
paid in error or excess shall be returned to the member insurer.
(10) The association may request information of member insurers in or-
der to aid in the exercise of its power under this section, and member insur-
ers shall promptly comply with the request.


SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.